District of Columbia statutes.
25-702

Employees — Notice of employee’s criminal conviction.

A licensee shall immediately notify the Board in writing if the licensee discovers that a employee who sells or serves any alcoholic beverage has, at any time up to 5 years before or during her or his employment, been convicted for other than minor traffic violations.

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959